Tennessee statutes. Title 17 Judges And Chancellors
Part 1

Qualifications and Selection

17-1-101. Age.

A judge of the supreme court shall be thirty-five (35) years of age; of other courts, thirty (30) years of age.

Code 1858, § 3910 (deriv. Const. 1834, art. 6, §§ 3, 4); Shan., § 5703; Code 1932, § 9889; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-101.

Cross-References. Age requirements for judges, Tenn. Const., art. VI, §§ 3, 4.

Expense accounts, §§8-26-101,8-26-102.

Impeachment, title 8, ch. 46, parts 1, 2.

Retired judges, assignment to relieve congested dockets, §8-36-806.

Salaries, §§8-23-103,8-23-104.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 566.

Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 24.10.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judges, § 4.

Law Reviews.

Inferiority Complex: Should State Courts Follow Lower Federal Court Precedent on the Meaning of Federal Law?, 68 Vand. L. Rev. 53 (2015).

Original Meaning and the Precedent Fallback, 68 Vand. L. Rev. 105 (2015).

Rookie Year on the Federal Bench (Hon. Ronald Lee Gilman), 36 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 22 (2000).

The Tennessee Court System (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 189.

Comparative Legislation. Judges:

Ala. Code §12-2-1 et seq.; §12-3-1 et seq.

Ark. Code §16-13-901 et seq.; §16-13-309 et seq.

Ga. Const. art. VI, § 7.

Ky. Const. § 117 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. §9-1-9 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 476.280 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 7A-1 et seq.

Va. Code § 17-2 et seq; § 17-119.1:2 et seq.

Collateral References. 46 Am. Jur. 2d Judges § 7.

48 C.J.S. Judges § 17.

17-1-102. Residence.

Each judge and chancellor of a circuit, criminal or chancery court is required to reside in the judicial district or division for which the judge and chancellor is elected, and a removal from the judicial district or division creates a vacancy in the office.

Code 1858, § 3914 (deriv. Acts 1809 (Sept.), ch. 49, § 7; 1835-1836, ch. 5, § 2); Shan., § 5707; Code 1932, § 9893; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-102.

Cross-References. Residency requirements for state judges, Tenn Const., art. VI, § 4.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 614.

Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 24.10.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

Attorney General Opinions. Factors used to determine residency status, OAG 95-019 (3/27/95).

17-1-103. Election.

The judges of the supreme court, the court of appeals, and the court of criminal appeals shall be elected by the qualified voters of the state in a statewide retention election conducted in accordance with chapter 4, part 1 of this title, and any appointments to fill a vacancy or a full eight-year term shall be made in accordance with chapter 4, part 1 of this title.

The chancellors, circuit court judges, criminal court judges, and judges of any other state trial court of record shall be elected by the qualified voters of their respective judicial districts, as provided in the general election law set forth in title 2, and any appointments due to a vacancy in any of these offices shall be made in accordance with chapter 4, part 3 of this title.

Code 1858, §§ 307, 308 (deriv. Const. 1834, art. 6, §§ 3, 4); Shan., § 374; mod. Code 1932, § 631; impl. am. Acts 1967, ch. 226, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-103; Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. The provision for election of court of appeals judges in this section may be affected by chapter 4 of this title concerning the selection of appellate court judges.

For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment rewrote the section which read: “The judges of the supreme court, court of appeals and court of criminal appeals are elected by the qualified voters of the state at large; the chancellors, circuit judges and judges of special courts, by the qualified voters of the respective judicial districts and special judicial districts.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 23. January 28, 2016.

Cross-References. Appellate court nominating commission, title 17, ch. 4.

Election of judges, Tenn. Const., art. VI, §§ 3, 4.

Election of judges of court of criminal appeals, §16-5-103.

Election of judges of the supreme court, §§2-3-202,16-3-101.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 614.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judges, § 5.

Law Reviews.

Rookie Year on the Federal Bench (Hon. Ronald Lee Gilman), 36 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 22 (2000).

The Judicial System in Tennessee and Potentialities for Reorganization — Judges in Tennessee (Elvin E. Overton), 82 Tenn. L. Rev. 514.

Cited: State ex rel. Smiley v. Glenn, 54 Tenn. 472, 1872 Tenn. LEXIS 75 (1872); Cousin v. Sundquist, 145 F.3d 818, 1998 FED App. 171P, 1998 U.S. App. LEXIS 10796 (6th Cir. Tenn. 1998), cert. denied, 525 U.S. 1138, 119 S. Ct. 1026, 143 L. Ed. 2d 37, 1999 U.S. LEXIS 1020 (U.S. Feb. 22, 1999); Green v. Jones, — S.W.3d —, 2012 Tenn. App. LEXIS 455 (Tenn. Ct. App. July 10, 2012).

17-1-104. Oath of office.

Before entering upon the duties of office, every judge and chancellor in this state is required to take an oath or affirmation to support the constitutions of the United States and that of this state, and to administer justice without respect of persons, and impartially to discharge all the duties incumbent on a judge or chancellor, to the best of the judge's or chancellor's skill and ability. The oath shall be administered in accordance with title 8 or any other applicable law.

Code 1858, §§ 309, 310, 3911; Acts 1870, ch. 24, § 2; Shan., §§ 378, 379, 5704; mod. Code 1932, §§ 635, 636, 9890; modified; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-104; Acts 2010, ch. 620, § 1; 2015, ch. 38, § 1.

Compiler's Notes For the Preamble to the act concerning legislative intent, please refer to Acts 2015, ch. 38.

Amendments. The 2010 amendment substituted “that of this state” for “of this state” in the first sentence; and substituted “such judge, a retired judge, a retired chancellor or an active or retired judge of the court of general sessions” for “such judge or judge of the court of general sessions” at the end of the last sentence.

The 2015 amendment substituted “The oath shall be administered in accordance with title 8 or any other applicable law” for “The oath may be taken by a supreme court judge before the governor, or another supreme court judge; and by an inferior court judge, before another such judge, a retired judge, a retired chancellor or an active or retired judge of the court of general sessions.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 620, § 2. July 1, 2010.

Acts 2015, ch. 38, § 5. July 1, 2015.

Cross-References. Administration and filing of oath §§8-18-107 —8-18-114.

Oath of special judge, §17-2-120.

Law Reviews.

Reopening Tennessee's Open Courts Clause: A Historical Reconsideration of Article I, Section 17 of the Tennessee Constitution, 27 U. Mem. L. Rev. 333 (1997).

17-1-105. Practice of law prohibited.

No judge or chancellor shall practice law, or perform any of the functions of attorney or counsel, in any of the courts of this state, except in cases in which the judge or chancellor may have been employed as counsel previous to the judge's or chancellor's election. A newly elected or appointed judge or chancellor can practice law only in an effort to wind up the judge or chancellor's practice, ceasing to practice as soon as reasonably possible and in no event longer than one hundred eighty (180) days after assuming office.

Code 1858, § 3912 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 331, § 1); Shan., § 5705; Code 1932, § 9891; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-105; Acts 2012, ch. 789, § 3.

Amendments. The 2012 amendment added the last sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 789, § 7. April 23, 2012.

Cross-References. County judges authorized to practice, §16-16-106.

Practice of law prohibited, §23-3-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judges, § 8.

Law Reviews.

Ethical Obligations of Judges (Joe G. Riley), 23 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 507 (1993).

Attorney General Opinions. General authority of judges of general sessions to administer oaths is not limited by T.C.A. §§8-18-107,8-18-109(b) or17-1-105, OAG 03-043 (4/15/03).

17-1-106. Judges to be lawyers — Exceptions.

In addition to the qualifications provided for judges by Tenn. Const. art. VI, §§ 3 and 4, judges of the supreme court, court of appeals, chancery courts, circuit courts, criminal courts, and courts exercising the jurisdiction imposed in one (1) or more of the chancery courts, circuit courts or criminal courts, shall be learned in the law, which must be evidenced by the judge being authorized to practice law in the courts of this state.

This section shall not apply to courts of general sessions in counties of this state having a population according to the federal census of 1960 or any subsequent federal census as follows:

not less than nor more than

4,000 4,500

4,700 4,800

4,900 4,950

5,100 5,200

5,250 5,300

5,900 6,000

6,250 6,300

7,250 7,300

7,800 7,825

8,000 8,400

8,400 8,500

8,500 8,600

9,500 9,571

10,600 10,700

11,500 11,511

11,512 11,525

11,850 11,900

11,900 11,950

12,170 12,200

12,500 12,600

13,000 13,500

14,300 14,400

15,400 15,500

16,100 16,200

17,000 17,500

18,000 18,500

18,800 18,850

19,000 19,100

19,100 20,000

21,000 21,100

21,450 21,500

21,500 21,600

22,200 22,300

24,200 24,240

25,500 25,600

26,950 27,000

27,650 27,700

28,600 28,650

30,400 30,500

39,100 39,200

41,550 41,600

42,150 42,200

250,000 300,000

This section shall not apply to judges of the county courts nor to chairs of county courts in the various counties of this state except in those counties where such judges or chairs exercise general criminal jurisdiction normally exercised by the criminal and circuit courts, jurisdiction of purely civil cases in which a jury is provided for, except insanity proceedings and condemnation of land proceedings, and jurisdiction to hear and determine divorce cases.

Notwithstanding any provision of subsection (b) to the contrary, this section shall apply to any county having a population of not less than two hundred eighty-seven thousand seven hundred (287,700) nor more than two hundred eighty-seven thousand eight hundred (287,800), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Subdivision (c)(1) shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body of any county to which it may apply. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the county legislative body and shall be certified by such officer to the secretary of state.

Notwithstanding any other public or private act, law or charter provision, subsection (a) shall also apply to judges of city courts of all cities of this state having a population in excess of one hundred sixty thousand (160,000), according to the federal census of 1980 or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1961, ch. 283, § 1; 1965, ch. 85, § 1; 1965, ch. 336, § 1; 1973, ch. 312, § 1; 1974, ch. 521, § 1; T.C.A., § 17-119; modified; Acts 1983, ch. 180, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 201, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), §§ 7.1, 24.10.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judges, § 4.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — Necessary Qualifications for Judgeships, 30 Tenn. L. Rev. 640.

The Constitutional Policy That Judges Be Learned in the Law (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 47 Tenn. L. Rev. 689.

Cited: Crawford v. Gilpatrick, 646 S.W.2d 433, 1983 Tenn. LEXIS 608 (Tenn. 1983); Cousin v. Sundquist, 145 F.3d 818, 1998 FED App. 171P, 1998 U.S. App. LEXIS 10796 (6th Cir. Tenn. 1998), cert. denied, 525 U.S. 1138, 119 S. Ct. 1026, 143 L. Ed. 2d 37, 1999 U.S. LEXIS 1020 (U.S. Feb. 22, 1999); City of White House v. Whitley, 979 S.W.2d 262, 1998 Tenn. LEXIS 573 (Tenn. 1998).

17-1-107. Uniformly reported caseload statistics.

No additional state trial judge positions shall be created until the Tennessee comptroller of the treasury has established uniformly reported caseload statistics, which may include a weighted caseload formula and that prioritizes the need for additional positions among the judicial districts. The Tennessee comptroller of the treasury shall certify the data to the judiciary committee of the house of representatives and the judiciary committee of the senate.

Acts 1997, ch. 430, § 2; 2013, ch. 236, § 37; 2019, ch. 345, § 27; 2019, ch. 420, § 24.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “the civil justice committee of the house of representatives and the judiciary committee of the senate” for “the judiciary committees of the house of representatives and the senate” at the end of the last sentence.

The 2019 amendment by ch. 345 substituted “judiciary” for “civil justice” following “data to the” in the second sentence.

The 2019 amendment by ch. 420 substituted “comptroller of the treasury” for “judicial council” in the first sentence, and “The Tennessee comptroller of the treasury” for “The judicial council” in the last sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 236, § 94. April 19, 2013.

Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

Acts 2019, ch. 420, § 27. May 21, 2019.